Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2314
Retirement system; powers.

The retirement system may sue or be sued in the name of the system, and in all actions brought by or against it, the system shall be represented by the Attorney General.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 14, p. 407;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 6.